Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-514
Audiologist; initiate aural rehabilitation; when.

Before any audiologist initiates any aural rehabilitation for an individual, the audiologist shall have in his or her possession evidence of a current otologic examination performed by a physician or the audiologist shall issue a written statement that the individual has been informed that he or she may have a medically or surgically remediable hearing loss and should seek the advice of a physician. The audiologist and the individual receiving aural rehabilitation shall sign the statement and a copy of the statement shall be provided to the individual. All vestibular testing performed by an audiologist shall be done at the referral of a physician and, whenever possible, at the referral of an otolaryngologist or neurologist.

Laws 1978, LB 406, § 16;

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 17;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,189;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 199.